Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 3

Homebuyers' Revolving Loan Fund Pool

13-23-301. Creation and use of fund.

There is established a homebuyers' revolving loan fund pool for participating Tennessee counties, for the purposes set out in this part, to be administered by the Tennessee housing development agency, herein referred to as “THDA”, in accordance with this part. The cost of administering this fund shall be borne by THDA out of its own administrative budget.

The funds provided for by this part shall be used to make loans to low and moderate income persons in areas which have critical housing needs for the purpose of such persons securing residential housing, including housing which has been substantially rehabilitated, by the owner of such substantially rehabilitated property or by any third party or business entity.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 1; 1986, ch. 510, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985, ch. 473 was repassed over the governor's veto on June 19, 1985.

Cross-References. Home mortgages, title 7, ch. 60.

Interest rates generally, title 47, ch. 14.

13-23-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Loan fund pool” means appropriations by the state and any appropriations, reserves or dedications of any funds by any county which desires to participate in the homebuyers' revolving loan fund pool;

“Local portion” means funds appropriated, reserved or dedicated by any county to fund its respective local portion of the loan fund pool;

“Low income and moderate persons” means qualified persons or families who lack the amount of income which is necessary, as determined by THDA, to enable them, without low interest financial assistance, to live in decent, safe and sanitary dwellings without overcrowding;

“Qualifying matching share” means funds from any source, other than funds appropriated, reserved or dedicated by the state or any county to specifically fund the state or any local portion, which are used to fund the amount of any loan not funded by the loan fund pool;

“State portion” means funds appropriated by the state to fund the state portion of the loan fund pool; and

“Substantial rehabilitation” means that improvements are made to residential real property exceeding thirty-five percent (35%) of the proposed market value of the structure after rehabilitation.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 2; 1986, ch. 510, § 2.

13-23-303. Initial capitalization funds — Surcharge.

Funds for the initial capitalization of the loan fund pool created by this part shall be used for loans to qualified low and moderate income persons and shall derive from the following sources in the following distribution, and payable at the rate of interest, if any, as herein provided:

State portion — Seventy percent (70%) of the loan fund pool shall consist of a two million five hundred thousand dollar ($2,500,000) appropriation for the state portion established by this part; and

Local portion — Thirty percent (30%) of the loan fund pool shall derive from appropriations, reserves or dedications by any county where the property is located which has agreed to participate in the project. Any county desiring to participate in the loan fund pool shall appropriate, reserve or dedicate revenues to fund its respective local portion prior to its acceptance by THDA to participate in the loan fund pool created by this part.

Any county so participating may, by ordinance or resolution, levy a surcharge of one dollar ($1.00) per residential permit and five dollars ($5.00) per commercial permit issued by the county agency or department of codes administration.

Such surcharge may be levied on construction, plumbing, electrical, mechanical, moving, demolition, sign, use and occupancy, sand and gravel extraction, extension, trailer space and mobile home space, curb cut, driveway entrances and exits, sidewalks, automatic sprinklers, standpipes, and excavation and grading permits, as well as any other permit which may be issued by the county agency or department of codes administration.

All surcharges collected pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be reserved, dedicated, or appropriated to fund, in whole or in part, the local portion of the homebuyers' revolving loan fund program.

If state portion funds are not available, then surcharges collected pursuant to this subsection (b) may be used as the sole source for funding the county's homebuyers' revolving loan fund program or may be used in combination with such other funding sources as may be available.

This subsection (b) applies only to counties of the first and second classes as classified in § 8-24-101; and to counties having a population of:

not less than nor more than

21,575 21,675

37,000 37,100

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 3; 1986, ch. 510, § 3; 1987, ch. 367, §§ 1-3; 1999, ch. 68, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-23-304. Qualifying matching share funding.

Funding for any qualifying matching share shall derive from any source, public or private, other than appropriations, reserves or dedications utilized to fund the state and local portions of the loan fund pool.

The interest rate charged to the borrower of such funds shall not exceed the prevailing market rate of interest for residential mortgages and shall not be less than a rate which will produce a blended mortgage interest rate of three percent (3%) applicable to the total loan amount.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 4; 1986, ch. 510, § 4.

13-23-305. Loan limitations.

The amount of any loan to any borrower made by the loan fund pool created by this part shall not exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of the total loan amount, plus any permissible closing costs eligible for financing.

Loan agreements for repayment under this part shall not exceed thirty (30) years.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 5; 1986, ch. 510, § 5.

13-23-306. Application to participate.

A county which desires to participate in the loan fund pool established by this part shall file with THDA, in the manner prescribed by THDA, its intent to participate and the extent of its financial participation within ninety (90) days following March 5, 1986, in order to be eligible to participate in the loan fund pool during its first twelve-months of operation. THDA shall promulgate rules and regulations governing filings in subsequent twelve-month periods of operation.

The THDA shall accept only one (1) application to establish a loan fund pool per county.

In the absence of an application by any county, an incorporated municipality located within such county may file an individual or, with other municipalities in the county, a joint application, but only with such county's sponsorship.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 6; 1986, ch. 510, § 6.

13-23-307. Rules and regulations — Reports.

THDA shall promulgate rules and regulations which guarantee equitable distribution of state appropriations for the homebuyers' revolving loan fund projects throughout the state, based upon the unmet housing needs of both rural and urban communities. However, this provision does not apply to funds appropriated pursuant to § 13-23-312.

THDA shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to accomplish the effect and intent of this part in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

THDA is required to make annual status reports on the homebuyers' revolving loan fund pool activities to the governor and general assembly.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, §§ 7, 11; 1986, ch. 510, §§ 7, 11.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

13-23-308. Administration of program — Deposits — Disposition of funds.

Any county may administer its own program under this part with THDA oversight.

All funding for state and local portions shall be deposited in an accredited financial institution located within such administrating county and used for the purposes of this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 8; 1986, ch. 510, § 8.

13-23-309. Persons to benefit from loans — Interest.

Any loans to borrowers, including interest earned on investment of repayments of such loans, by any participating county, shall be used to benefit low and moderate income individuals or families residing within such county during its participation in the loan fund pool. All such interest repayments shall be added to the loan fund pool and deposited in the local financial depository designated by the administrating county or with THDA in cases where local counties opt for THDA administration of their respective loan fund pools.

Interest earned on investment of repayments of the local portion of the loan fund pool shall be allocated solely to the county from which such portion is derived, and such interest earnings shall be included in determining the respective amount of the local portion required under § 13-23-303(a)(2) in any year following the initial year of such county's participation.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 9; 1986, ch. 510, § 9.

13-23-310. Termination of participation.

Any county may opt to terminate its participation in the loan fund pool by giving at least three (3) months' notice to THDA prior to the expiration of any twelve-month term of operation of the loan fund pool. Any such termination is without prejudice as regards participation of such terminating county in any subsequent twelve-month term of the loan fund pool. However, such terminating county's allocation of interest earnings on repayments reverts to the loan fund pool and shall be utilized for the purposes described in this part. Acceptance of any new application by such terminating county during any subsequent twelve-month term of operation of the loan fund pool is not deemed to be a forgiveness of the interest forfeiture mandated by this section.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 10; 1986, ch. 510, § 10.

13-23-311. Appropriation of state's funding portion.

Funding for the state portion of the loan fund pool established by this part is subject to funds appropriated for this purpose in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1985, ch. 473, § 12; 1986, ch. 510, § 13.

13-23-312. State allocations for pilot demonstration and statewide programs — Local government funding.

The state shall allocate two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in fiscal year 1985-1986 to fund a pilot demonstration program in any county having a population of more than seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Under the pilot demonstration, appropriate operational rules and procedures shall be developed and tested and appropriate documentation provided to the general assembly to evaluate the effectiveness of the program.

Subsequent allocations under this part to provide for expansion as a statewide program shall be based upon the results of the demonstration program as herein established, shall be reviewed annually, and shall be modeled after the rules and procedures as established under the pilot demonstration. To the extent that subsequent allocations from the state are made available under this part for housing assistance to very low and low income households, then such allocation is subject to funding provided through the housing program fund established in title 13, chapter 23, part 4, and in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the agency, pursuant thereto.

Local participating governments may establish a loan fund endowment in connection with the homebuyers' revolving loan program, and may charge up to five dollars ($5.00) per month for the term of the loan as a participation fee in lieu of interest on loans made to qualified buyers. All proceeds from a loan fund endowment shall be used to support the revolving loan fund and may be used as local matching funds as required under this part.

A local participating government may make “in-kind” contributions toward its matching share, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total match required. Such in-kind match shall include, but not be limited to, personnel costs, program support costs, such as accounting, audit, purchasing services, and other costs as established by a cost allocation plan which directly supports program operations.

A local participating government may use up to ten percent (10%) of its matching cash contribution for administrative purposes to be based either upon a cost allocation plan or upon actual expenditure basis.

Acts 1986, ch. 510, § 12; 1988, ch. 900, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.